Illinois, session 104th, SB88.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Affordable Housing Act is amended 5by changing Sections 3 and 8 as follows: 6    (310 ILCS 65/3)  (from Ch. 67 1/2, par. 1253)7    Sec. 3. Definitions. As used in this Act:8    (a) "Program" means the Illinois Affordable Housing 9Program.10    (b) "Trust Fund" means the Illinois Affordable Housing 11Trust Fund.12    (b-5) (Blank). 13    (c) "Low-income household" means a single person, family 14or unrelated persons living together whose adjusted income is 15more than 50%, but less than 80%, of the median income of the 16area of residence, adjusted for family size, as such adjusted 17income and median income for the area are determined from time 18to time by the United States Department of Housing and Urban 19Development for purposes of Section 8 of the United States 20Housing Act of 1937.21    (d) "Very low-income household" means a single person, 22family or unrelated persons living together whose adjusted 23income is not more than 50% of the median income of the area of   SB0088- 2 -LRB104 03364 KTG 13386 b1residence, adjusted for family size, as such adjusted income 2and median income for the area are determined from time to time 3by the United States Department of Housing and Urban 4Development for purposes of Section 8 of the United States 5Housing Act of 1937.6    (e) "Affordable housing" means residential housing that, 7so long as the same is occupied by low-income households or 8very low-income households, requires payment of monthly 9housing costs, including utilities other than telephone, of no 10more than 30% of the maximum allowable income as stated for 11such households as defined in this Section.12    (f) "Multi-family housing" means a building or buildings 13providing housing to 5 or more households.14    (g) "Single-family housing" means a building containing 15one to 4 dwelling units, including a mobile home as defined in 16subsection (b) of Section 3 of the Mobile Home Landlord and 17Tenant Rights Act, as amended.18    (h) "Community-based organization" means a not-for-profit 19entity whose governing body includes a majority of members who 20reside in the community served by the organization.21    (i) "Advocacy organization" means a not-for-profit 22organization which conducts, in part or in whole, activities 23to influence public policy on behalf of low-income or very 24low-income households.25    (j) "Program Administrator" means the Illinois Housing 26Development Authority.  SB0088- 3 -LRB104 03364 KTG 13386 b1    (k) "Funding Agent" means the Illinois Department of Human 2Services.3    (l) "Commission" means the Affordable Housing Advisory 4Commission.5    (m) "Congregate housing" means a building or structure in 6which 2 or more households, inclusive, share common living 7areas and may share child care, cleaning, cooking and other 8household responsibilities.9    (n) "Eligible applicant" means a proprietorship, 10partnership, for-profit corporation, not-for-profit 11corporation or unit of local government which seeks to use 12fund assets as provided in this Article.13    (o) "Moderate income household" means a single person, 14family or unrelated persons living together whose adjusted 15income is more than 80% but less than 120% of the median income 16of the area of residence, adjusted for family size, as such 17adjusted income and median income for the area are determined 18from time to time by the United States Department of Housing 19and Urban Development for purposes of Section 8 of the United 20States Housing Act of 1937.21    (p) "Affordable Housing Program Trust Fund Bonds or Notes" 22means the bonds or notes issued by the Program Administrator 23under the Illinois Housing Development Act to further the 24purposes of this Act.25    (q) "Trust Fund Moneys" means all moneys, deposits, 26revenues, income, interest, dividends, receipts, taxes,   SB0088- 4 -LRB104 03364 KTG 13386 b1proceeds and other amounts or funds deposited or to be 2deposited into the Trust Fund pursuant to subsection (b) of 3Section 5 of this Act and any proceeds, investments or 4increase thereof.5    (r) "Program Escrow" means accounts, except those accounts 6relating to any Affordable Housing Program Trust Fund Bonds or 7Notes, designated by the Program Administrator, into which 8Trust Fund Moneys are deposited.9    (s) "Common household pet" means a domesticated animal, 10such as a dog (canis lupus familiaris) or cat (felis catus), 11which is commonly kept in the home for pleasure rather than for 12commercial purposes. 13    (t) "Housing counseling" means services provided by an 14organization approved by the United States Department of 15Housing and Urban Development to be a HUD-Approved Housing 16Counseling Agency. 17(Source: P.A. 102-283, eff. 1-1-22; 103-8, eff. 7-1-23; 18103-616, eff. 7-1-24.) 19    (310 ILCS 65/8)  (from Ch. 67 1/2, par. 1258)20    Sec. 8. Uses of Trust Fund. 21    (a) Subject to annual appropriation to the Funding Agent 22and subject to the prior dedication, allocation, transfer and 23use of Trust Fund Moneys as provided in Sections 8(b), 8(c) and 249 of this Act, the Trust Fund may be used to make grants, 25mortgages, or other loans to acquire, construct, rehabilitate,   SB0088- 5 -LRB104 03364 KTG 13386 b1develop, operate, insure, and retain affordable single-family 2and multi-family housing in this State for low-income and very 3low-income households. Funds may also be used for housing 4counseling. The majority of monies appropriated to the Trust 5Fund in any given year are to be used for affordable housing 6for very low-income households. For the fiscal years 2007, 72008, and 2009 only, the Department of Human Services is 8authorized to receive appropriations and spend moneys from the 9Illinois Affordable Housing Trust Fund for the purpose of 10developing and coordinating public and private resources 11targeted to meet the affordable housing needs of low-income, 12very low-income, and special needs households in the State of 13Illinois. 14    (b) For each fiscal year commencing with fiscal year 1994, 15the Program Administrator shall certify from time to time to 16the Funding Agent, the Comptroller and the State Treasurer 17amounts, up to an aggregate in any fiscal year of $10,000,000, 18of Trust Fund Moneys expected to be used or pledged by the 19Program Administrator during the fiscal year for the purposes 20and uses specified in Sections 8(c) and 9 of this Act. Subject 21to annual appropriation, upon receipt of such certification, 22the Funding Agent and the Comptroller shall dedicate and the 23State Treasurer shall transfer not less often than monthly to 24the Program Administrator or its designated payee, without 25requisition or further request therefor, all amounts 26accumulated in the Trust Fund within the State Treasury and   SB0088- 6 -LRB104 03364 KTG 13386 b1not already transferred to the Loan Commitment Account prior 2to the Funding Agent's receipt of such certification, until 3the Program Administrator has received the aggregate amount 4certified by the Program Administrator, to be used solely for 5the purposes and uses authorized and provided in Sections 8(c) 6and 9 of this Act. Neither the Comptroller nor the Treasurer 7shall transfer, dedicate or allocate any of the Trust Fund 8Moneys transferred or certified for transfer by the Program 9Administrator as provided above to any other fund, nor shall 10the Governor authorize any such transfer, dedication or 11allocation, nor shall any of the Trust Fund Moneys so 12dedicated, allocated or transferred be used, temporarily or 13otherwise, for interfund borrowing, or be otherwise used or 14appropriated, except as expressly authorized and provided in 15Sections 8(c) and 9 of this Act for the purposes and subject to 16the priorities, limitations and conditions provided for 17therein until such obligations, uses and dedications as 18therein provided, have been satisfied.19    (c) Notwithstanding Section 5(b) of this Act, any Trust 20Fund Moneys transferred to the Program Administrator pursuant 21to Section 8(b) of this Act, or otherwise obtained, paid to or 22held by or for the Program Administrator, or pledged pursuant 23to resolution of the Program Administrator, for Affordable 24Housing Program Trust Fund Bonds or Notes under the Illinois 25Housing Development Act, and all proceeds, payments and 26receipts from investments or use of such moneys, including any   SB0088- 7 -LRB104 03364 KTG 13386 b1residual or additional funds or moneys generated or obtained 2in connection with any of the foregoing, may be held, pledged, 3applied or dedicated by the Program Administrator as follows: 4        (1) as required by the terms of any pledge of or 5    resolution of the Program Administrator authorized under 6    Section 9 of this Act in connection with Affordable 7    Housing Program Trust Fund Bonds or Notes issued pursuant 8    to the Illinois Housing Development Act; 9        (2) to or for costs of issuance and administration and 10    the payments of any principal, interest, premium or other 11    amounts or expenses incurred or accrued in connection with 12    Affordable Housing Program Trust Fund Bonds or Notes, 13    including rate protection contracts and credit support 14    arrangements pertaining thereto, and, provided such 15    expenses, fees and charges are obligations, whether 16    recourse or nonrecourse, and whether financed with or paid 17    from the proceeds of Affordable Housing Program Trust Fund 18    Bonds or Notes, of the developers, mortgagors or other 19    users, the Program Administrator's expenses and servicing, 20    administration and origination fees and charges in 21    connection with any loans, mortgages, or developments 22    funded or financed or expected to be funded or financed, 23    in whole or in part, from the issuance of Affordable 24    Housing Program Trust Fund Bonds or Notes; 25        (3) to or for costs of issuance and administration and 26    the payments of principal, interest, premium, loan fees,   SB0088- 8 -LRB104 03364 KTG 13386 b1    and other amounts or other obligations of the Program 2    Administrator, including rate protection contracts and 3    credit support arrangements pertaining thereto, for loans, 4    commercial paper or other notes or bonds issued by the 5    Program Administrator pursuant to the Illinois Housing 6    Development Act, provided that the proceeds of such loans, 7    commercial paper or other notes or bonds are paid or 8    expended in connection with, or refund or repay, loans, 9    commercial paper or other notes or bonds issued or made in 10    connection with bridge loans or loans for the 11    construction, renovation, redevelopment, restructuring, 12    reorganization of Affordable Housing and related expenses, 13    including development costs, technical assistance, or 14    other amounts to construct, preserve, improve, renovate, 15    rehabilitate, refinance, or assist Affordable Housing, 16    including financially troubled Affordable Housing, 17    permanent or other financing for which has been funded or 18    financed or is expected to be funded or financed in whole 19    or in part by the Program Administrator through the 20    issuance of or use of proceeds from Affordable Housing 21    Program Trust Fund Bonds or Notes; 22        (4) to or for direct expenditures or reimbursement for 23    development costs, technical assistance, or other amounts 24    to construct, preserve, improve, renovate, rehabilitate, 25    refinance, or assist Affordable Housing, including 26    financially troubled Affordable Housing, permanent or   SB0088- 9 -LRB104 03364 KTG 13386 b1    other financing for which has been funded or financed or 2    is expected to be funded or financed in whole or in part by 3    the Program Administrator through the issuance of or use 4    of proceeds from Affordable Housing Program Trust Fund 5    Bonds or Notes; and 6        (5) for deposit into any residual, sinking, reserve or 7    revolving fund or pool established by the Program 8    Administrator, whether or not pledged to secure Affordable 9    Housing Program Trust Fund Bonds or Notes, to support or 10    be utilized for the issuance, redemption, or payment of 11    the principal, interest, premium or other amounts payable 12    on or with respect to any existing, additional or future 13    Affordable Housing Program Trust Fund Bonds or Notes, or 14    to or for any other expenditure authorized by this Section 15    8(c).16    (d) All or a portion of the Trust Fund Moneys on deposit or 17to be deposited in the Trust Fund not already certified for 18transfer or transferred to the Program Administrator pursuant 19to Section 8(b) of this Act may be used to secure the repayment 20of Affordable Housing Program Trust Fund Bonds or Notes, or 21otherwise to supplement or support Affordable Housing funded 22or financed or intended to be funded or financed, in whole or 23in part, by Affordable Housing Program Trust Fund Bonds or 24Notes.25    (e) Assisted housing may include housing for special needs 26populations such as the homeless, single-parent families, the   SB0088- 10 -LRB104 03364 KTG 13386 b1elderly, or persons with disabilities. The Trust Fund shall be 2used to implement a demonstration congregate housing project 3for any such special needs population.4    (f) Grants from the Trust Fund may include, but are not 5limited to, rental assistance and security deposit subsidies 6for low and very low-income households.7    (g) The Trust Fund may be used to pay actual and reasonable 8costs for Commission members to attend Commission meetings, 9and any litigation costs and expenses, including legal fees, 10incurred by the Program Administrator in any litigation 11related to this Act or its action as Program Administrator.12    (h) The Trust Fund may be used to make grants for (1) the 13provision of technical assistance, (2) outreach, and (3) 14building an organization's capacity to develop affordable 15housing projects.16    (i) Amounts on deposit in the Trust Fund may be used to 17reimburse the Program Administrator and the Funding Agent for 18costs incurred in the performance of their duties under this 19Act, excluding costs and fees of the Program Administrator 20associated with the Program Escrow to the extent withheld 21pursuant to paragraph (8) of subsection (b) of Section 5.22(Source: P.A. 99-143, eff. 7-27-15.)